Florida, session 2026, SB1370.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as âIsaiahâs Law.â 11 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 322.264, Florida 12 Statutes, is amended to read: 13 322.264ââHabitual traffic offenderâ defined.âA âhabitual 14 traffic offenderâ is any person whose record, as maintained by 15 the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, shows that 16 such person has accumulated the specified number of convictions 17 for offenses described in subsection (1) or subsection (2) 18 within a 5-year period: 19 (1)âThree or more convictions of any one or more of the 20 following offenses arising out of separate acts: 21 (a)âVoluntary or involuntary manslaughter resulting from 22 the operation of a motor vehicle; 23 (b)âAny violation of s. 316.193, former s. 316.1931, or 24 former s. 860.01; 25 (c)âAny felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle 26 is used; 27 (d)âDriving a motor vehicle while his or her license is 28 suspended or revoked; 29 (e)âFailing to stop and render aid as required under the 30 laws of this state in the event of a motor vehicle crash 31 resulting in the death or personal injury of another; or 32 (f)âDriving a commercial motor vehicle while his or her 33 privilege is disqualified; or 34 (g)âDriving a motor vehicle without a valid license in 35 violation of s. 322.03. 36 37 Any violation of any federal law, any law of another state or 38 country, or any valid ordinance of a municipality or county of 39 another state similar to a statutory prohibition specified in 40 subsection (1) or subsection (2) shall be counted as a violation 41 of such prohibition. In computing the number of convictions, all 42 convictions during the 5 years previous to July 1, 1972, will be 43 used, provided at least one conviction occurs after that date. 44 The fact that previous convictions may have resulted in 45 suspension, revocation, or disqualification under another 46 section does not exempt them from being used for suspension or 47 revocation under this section as a habitual offender. 48 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.